Utah statutes.
53A-11-302.   Immunizations required -- Exceptions -- Grounds for exemption
from required immunizations.
(1)  A student may not enter school without a certificate of immunization,
except as provided in this section.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 53A-1-1001, a student who at the time of
school enrollment has not been completely immunized against each specified
disease may attend school under a conditional enrollment if the student has
received one dose of each specified vaccine prior to enrollment.
(3)  A student is exempt from receiving the required immunizations if there is
presented to the appropriate official of the school one or more of the
following:
(a)  a certificate from a licensed physician stating that due to the physical
condition of the student one or more specified immunizations would endanger
the student's life or health;
(b)  A completed form obtained at the local health department where the
student resides, providing:
(i)  the information required under Subsection 53A-11-302.5(1); and
(ii)  a statement that the person has a personal belief opposed to
immunizations, which is signed by one of the individuals listed in Subsection
53A-11-302(3)(c) and witnessed by the local health officer or his designee; or
(c)  a statement that the person is a bona fide member of a specified,
recognized religious organization whose teachings are contrary to
immunizations, signed by one of the following persons:
(i)  one of the student's parents;
(ii)  the student's guardian;
(iii)  a legal age brother or sister of a student who has no parent or
guardian; or
(iv)  the student, if of legal age.
